Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2539
Commission members; mileage; payment.

The members of the commission appointed pursuant to section 29-2537 shall each receive mileage at the rate authorized in section 81-1176 for state employees for each mile actually and necessarily traveled in reaching and returning from the place where the convicted person is confined and examined, and it is hereby made the duty of the commission to act in this capacity without compensation other than that already provided for them by law. All of the findings and orders aforesaid shall be entered in the district court records of the county wherein the convicted person was originally tried and sentenced, and the costs therefor, including those providing for the mileage of the members of the commission, shall be allowed and paid in the usual manner by the county in which the convicted person was tried and sentenced to death.

Laws 1973, LB 268, § 24;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 44;

Laws 2009, LB36, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 35;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
The repeal of section 29-2539 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 35, is not effective because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.